Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.130

Criminal profiteering lien—Trustee of real property.

(1) A trustee who is personally served in the manner provided for service of legal process with written notice that a lien notice has been recorded or a civil proceeding or criminal proceeding has been instituted under this chapter against any person for whom the trustee holds legal or record title to real property, shall immediately furnish to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney the following:

(a) The name and address of the person, as known to the trustee;

(b) To the extent known to the trustee, the name and address of all other persons for whose benefit the trustee holds title to the real property; and

(c) If requested by the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney, a copy of the trust agreement or other instrument under which the trustee holds legal or record title to the real property.

(2) The recording of a lien notice shall not constitute a lien on the record title to real property owned by a trustee at the time of recording except to the extent that trustee is named in and served with the lien notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may bring a civil proceeding in superior court against the trustee to recover from the trustee the amounts set forth in RCW 9A.82.150. In addition to amounts recovered under RCW 9A.82.150, the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney also may recover its investigative costs and attorneys' fees.

(3) The recording of a lien notice does not affect the use to which real property or a beneficial interest owned by the person named in the lien notice may be put or the right of the person to receive any avails, rents, or other proceeds resulting from the use and ownership except the sale of the property, until a judgment of forfeiture is entered.

(4) This section does not apply to any conveyance by a trustee under a court order unless the court order is entered in an action between the trustee and the beneficiary.

(5) Notwithstanding that a trustee is served with notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this section does not apply to a conveyance by a trustee required under the terms of any trust agreement in effect before service of such notice on the trustee.

[ 2001 c 222 s 17. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 14; 1984 c 270 s 13.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.